Florida, session 2026, SB792.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 413.014, Florida Statutes, is amended to 26 read: 27 413.014âCommunity rehabilitation programs.â 28 (1)âThe Division of Blind Services shall enter into 29 cooperative agreements with community rehabilitation programs as 30 defined by the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, to be the 31 service providers for the blind citizens of their communities. 32 (2)âThe division shall, as rapidly as feasible, increase 33 the amount of such services provided by community rehabilitation 34 programs under subsection (3). The goal shall be to decrease the 35 amount of such services provided by division employees and to 36 increase to the maximum extent allowed by federal law the amount 37 of such services provided through cooperative agreements with 38 community service providers. The division shall seek, to the 39 maximum extent allowed by federal and state law and regulation, 40 all available federal funds for such purposes. Funds and in-kind 41 matching contributions from community and private sources shall 42 be used to maximize federal funds. Unless prohibited by federal 43 law or regulation, the share of the federal vocational 44 rehabilitation grant apportioned for services to the blind may 45 not be less than 17 percent. 46 (3)âA community rehabilitation program must, at a minimum, 47 meet all of the following requirements to qualify to enter into 48 a cooperative agreement with the division to provide services to 49 persons who are blind or visually impaired: 50 (a)âBe a qualified nonprofit agency for the blind as 51 defined in s. 413.033(3) and be organized and operated 52 exclusively for charitable purposes under s. 501(c)(3) of the 53 Internal Revenue Code or be an approved program at a state 54 college or university. 55 (b)âMaintain current accreditation from at least one of the 56 following national accrediting organizations: 57 1.âThe Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation 58 Facilities. 59 2.âThe Association for Education and Rehabilitation of the 60 Blind and Visually Impaired. 61 3.âAny other nationally recognized accrediting body for 62 vision rehabilitation services as determined by the director of 63 the division. 64 (c)âEmploy staff who hold a current, valid certification 65 from at least one of the following: 66 1.âThe Academy for Certification of Vision Rehabilitation 67 and Education Professionals. 68 2.âThe National Blindness Professional Certification Board. 69 3.âAny other nationally recognized certifying body for 70 vision rehabilitation professionals as determined by the 71 director of the division. 72 (d)âProvide services required under the cooperative 73 agreement by the division, including, but not limited to, the 74 following: 75 1.âActivities of daily living. 76 2.âAssessments. 77 3.âAssistive technology training. 78 4.âCommunication skills training. 79 5.âCommunity integration. 80 6.âCounseling. 81 7.âGuidance and career counseling. 82 8.âLow vision training. 83 9.âOrientation and mobility training. 84 10.âPreemployment transition services, including, but not 85 limited to, career coaching, development, and placement; 86 workplace readiness; personal assistance; vocational 87 rehabilitation; technology training; and transportation 88 services. 89 11.âRecreation and leisure activities training. 90 12.âSelf-advocacy training. 91 13.âSensory and cognitive development. 92 14.âOther services as determined by the director of the 93 division or as may be required by state and federal guidelines. 94 95 The director of the division may temporarily waive staff 96 requirements and community rehabilitation program requirements 97 under this subsection in order to approve new community 98 rehabilitation program organizations. 99 (4)(a)âA community rehabilitation program that meets the 100 requirements in subsection (3) is a priority service provider 101 for purposes of program funding. In addition to the requirements 102 in subsection (3), the community rehabilitation program must be 103 qualified, accredited, and certified with evidence-supported 104 outcomes aligned with the federal Rehabilitation Services 105 Administration performance indicators for services to persons 106 who are blind or visually impaired to ensure quality, safety, 107 accountability, and sustainability. 108 (b)âIn the event a community rehabilitation program is 109 unable to provide services to a specific client for any reason, 110 including client choice, suspension of services, capacity, or 111 timeliness, the division may enter into a cooperative agreement 112 for services with a noncommunity rehabilitation program private 113 vendor. The noncommunity rehabilitation program private vendor 114 must meet the requirements in subsection (3) and comply with all 115 requirements provided in the community rehabilitation program 116 cooperative agreement to ensure quality, safety, accountability, 117 and sustainability. If the division enters into a cooperative 118 agreement with a noncommunity rehabilitation program private 119 vendor to provide services, the community rehabilitation program 120 serving that same geographic area must be notified by the 121 division of the name of such private vendor to ensure that the 122 client receives the same level of high-quality service offered 123 by the community rehabilitation program. 124 (5)âThe Florida Association of Agencies Serving the Blind, 125 Inc., shall coordinate with the division to ensure cooperative 126 agreements for services meet the needs of blind and visually 127 impaired clients served by community rehabilitation program 128 member organizations and act on behalf of such clients on 129 cooperative agreement issues or other issues in the best 130 interest of serving the clients. 131 (6)âAs authorized by and consistent with funding 132 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act, the Florida 133 Association of Agencies Serving the Blind, Inc., may submit 134 requests to the Legislature for funding for community 135 rehabilitation programs. The division shall disperse funds to 136 community rehabilitation programs that are considered priority 137 service providers under paragraph (4)(a) within 45 days after 138 receipt of a qualified invoice and shall disperse subsequent 139 monthly payments thereafter. 140 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.